test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h17_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: skríggj
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: skríggj
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [skríggi, skríggj]
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: skrígs
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: skríggj
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: skríggj
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: skríggjum
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: skríggja
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: skríggið
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: skríggið
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: skrígginum
    skríggj+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: skrígsins
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: skríggini
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: skríggini
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: skríggjunum
    skríggj+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: skríggjanna
